Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 2. Rule Against Perpetuities.

§ 55.1-124.
Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities.

A nonvested property interest is invalid unless:

When the interest is created, it is certain to vest or terminate no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive; or

The interest either vests or terminates within 90 years after its creation.

A general power of appointment not presently exercisable because of a condition precedent is invalid unless:

When the power is created, the condition precedent is certain to be satisfied or becomes impossible to satisfy no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive; or

The condition precedent either is satisfied or becomes impossible to satisfy within 90 years after its creation.

A nongeneral power of appointment or a general testamentary power of appointment is invalid unless:

When the power is created, it is certain to be irrevocably exercised or otherwise to terminate no later than 21 years after the death of an individual then alive; or

The power is irrevocably exercised or otherwise terminates within 90 years after its creation.

In determining whether a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment is valid under subdivision A 1, B 1, or C 1, the possibility that a child will be born to an individual after the individual’s death is disregarded.

If, in measuring a period from the creation of a trust or other property arrangement, language in a governing instrument (i) seeks to disallow the vesting or termination of any interest or trust beyond, (ii) seeks to postpone the vesting or termination of any interest or trust until, or (iii) seeks to operate in effect in any similar fashion upon, the later of (a) the expiration of a period of time not exceeding 21 years after the death of the survivor of specified lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement or (b) the expiration of a period of time that exceeds or might exceed 21 years after the death of the survivor of lives in being at the creation of the trust or other property arrangement, that language is inoperative to the extent it produces a period of time that exceeds 21 years after the death of the survivor of the specified lives.

History.

2000, c. 714, § 55-12.1; 2019, c. 712.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala. § 35-4A-1 et seq.

Arkansas: A.C.A. § 18-3-101 et seq.

California: California Prob. Code §§ 21200 to 21225.

Colorado: C.R.S. §§ 15-11-1101 to 15-11-1107.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat. §§ 45a-490 to 45a-496.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code §§ 19-901 to 19-907.

Florida: Fla. Stat. § 689.225.

Georgia: O.C.G.A. §§ 44-6-200 to 44-6-206.

Hawaii: H.R.S. §§ 525-1 to 525-6.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code §§ 32-17-8-1 to 32-17-8-6.

Kansas: K.S.A. §§ 59-3401 to 59-3408.

Massachusetts: Mass. Ann. Laws ch. 184A §§ 1 to 11.

Michigan: M.C.L.S. §§ 554.71 to 554.78.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. §§ 501A.01 to 501A.07.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. § 89-25-1 et seq.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno. §§ 72-2-1001 to 72-2-1017.

Nebraska: R.R.S. Neb §§ 76-2001 to 76-2008.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 111.103 to 111.1039.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. §§ 45-2-901 to 45-2-906.

North Carolina: N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 41-15 to 41-23.

Oregon: O.R.S. §§ 105.950 to 105.975.

South Carolina: S.C. Code Ann. §§ 27-6-10 to 27-6-80.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. §§ 66-1-201 to 66-1-208.

Utah: Utah Code Ann. §§ 75-2-1201 to 75-2-1208.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code §§

36-1

A-1 to

36-1

A-8.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “The Future of Future Interests,” see 60 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 513 (2003).

For article, “Toward a Model Law of Estates and Future Interests,” see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2009).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 343 (2012).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The cases cited below were decided under prior law.

Interpretation of holographic codicil. —

Although a trust established by a holographic codicil violated the common-law rule against perpetuities and the statutory rule against perpetuities set forth in this section, the court was authorized by § 55-12.3 to reform the disposition of a will in a manner that most closely approximated the testatrix’s plan of distribution. Eubank v. Eubank, 68 Va. Cir. 33, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 86 (Amherst County Apr. 29, 2005).

Provision inapplicable. —

Where the contract for the sale of land provided that, if the property was not subdivided by the date of closing, that date was to be extended day-for-day until the sellers’ subdivision and/or adjustment of property lines was approved, the Virginia version of the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities under § 55-12.1 was inapplicable because § 55-12.1 did not apply to a nonvested property interest that arose out of a nondonative transfer. Bel-Aire, Inc. v. RB Trexlertown, LLC, 68 Va. Cir. 108, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 138 (Virginia Beach May 24, 2005).

§ 55.1-125.
When nonvested property interest or power of appointment created.

Except as provided in subsections B and C and in §

55.1-128

, the time of creation of a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment is determined under general principles of property law.

For the purposes of §§

55.1-124

through

55.1-129

, if there is a person who alone can exercise a power created by a governing instrument to become the unqualified beneficial owner of (i) a nonvested property interest or (ii) a property interest subject to a power of appointment described in subsection B or C in §

55.1-124

, the nonvested property interest or power of appointment is created when the power to become the unqualified beneficial owner terminates.

For the purposes of §§

55.1-124

through

55.1-129

, a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising from a transfer of property to a previously funded trust or other existing property arrangement is created when the nonvested property interest or power of appointment in the original contribution was created.

History.

2000, c. 714, § 55-12.2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-126.
Reformation.

Upon the petition of an interested person, a circuit court in the county or city in which the affected property or the greater part of such property is located shall reform a disposition in the manner that most closely approximates the transferor’s manifested plan of distribution and is within the 90 years allowed by subdivision A 2, B 2, or C 2 of §

55.1-124

if:

A nonvested property interest or a power of appointment becomes invalid under §

55.1-124

;

A class gift is not but might become invalid under §

55.1-124

and the time has arrived when the share of any class member is to take effect in possession or enjoyment; or

A nonvested property interest that is not validated by subdivision A 1 of §

55.1-124

can vest but not within 90 years after its creation.

History.

2000, c. 714, § 55-12.3; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Interpretation of holographic codicil. —

Although a trust established by a holographic codicil violated the common-law rule against perpetuities and the statutory rule against perpetuities set forth in § 55-12.1, the court was authorized by this section to reform the disposition of a will in a manner that most closely approximated the testatrix’s plan of distribution. Eubank v. Eubank, 68 Va. Cir. 33, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 86 (Amherst County Apr. 29, 2005).

§ 55.1-127.
Exclusions from statutory rule against perpetuities.

Section

55.1-124

does not apply to:

A nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising out of a nondonative transfer, except a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment arising out of (i) a premarital or postmarital agreement; (ii) a separation or divorce settlement; (iii) a spouse’s election; (iv) a similar arrangement arising out of a prospective, existing, or previous marital relationship between the parties; (v) a contract to make or not to revoke a will or trust; (vi) a contract to exercise or not to exercise a power of appointment; (vii) a transfer in satisfaction of a duty of support; or (viii) a reciprocal transfer;

A fiduciary’s power relating to the administration or management of assets, including the power of a fiduciary to sell, lease, or mortgage property, and the power of a fiduciary to determine principal and income;

A power to appoint a fiduciary;

A discretionary power of trustee to distribute principal before termination of a trust to a beneficiary having an indefensibly vested interest in the income and principal;

A nonvested property interest held by a charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision, if the nonvested property interest is preceded by an interest held by another charity, government, or governmental agency or subdivision;

A nonvested property interest in or a power of appointment with respect to a trust or other property arrangement forming part of a pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, health, disability, death benefit, income deferral, or other current or deferred benefit plan for one or more employees, independent contractors, or their beneficiaries or spouses, to which contributions are made for the purpose of distributing to or for the benefit of the participants or their beneficiaries or spouses the property, income, or principal in the trust or other property arrangement, except a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment that is created by an election of a participant or a beneficiary or spouse;

A property interest, power of appointment, or arrangement that was not subject to the common-law rule against perpetuities or is excluded by another statute of the Commonwealth; or

A nonvested interest in or power of appointment over personal property held in trust, or a power of appointment over personal property granted under a trust, if the trust instrument, by its terms, provides that §

55.1-124

shall not apply.

The exception to the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities under subdivision A 8 shall not extend to real property held in trust. For purposes of this subsection, real property does not include an interest in a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, business trust, or other entity, even if such entity owns an interest in real property.

History.

2000, c. 714, § 55-12.4; 2013, c. 323; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 323, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declarative of existing law.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

§ 55.1-128.
Prospective application.

Sections

55.1-124

through

55.1-129

apply to a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment that is created on or after July 1, 2000. For purposes of this section, a nonvested property interest or a power of appointment created by the exercise of a power of appointment is created when the power is irrevocably exercised or when a revocable exercise becomes irrevocable.

History.

2000, c. 714, § 55-12.5; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-129.
Uniformity of application and construction.

Sections

55.1-124

through

55.1-129

shall be applied and construed to effectuate their general purpose to make the law uniform with respect to the rule against perpetuities among states enacting it.

History.

2000, c. 714, § 55-12.6; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-130.
Certain limitations construed.

Every limitation in any deed or will contingent upon the dying of any person without heirs, heirs of the body, issue, issue of the body, children, offspring or descendants, or other relatives shall be construed a limitation to take effect when such person dies not having such heir, issue, child, offspring, descendant, or other relative, as the case may be, living at the time of his death, or born to him within 10 months after his death, unless the intention of such limitation be otherwise plainly declared on the face of the deed or will creating it.

History.

Code 1919, § 5151; Code 1950, § 55-13; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Perpetuities and Restraints on Alienation, § 6.

§ 55.1-131.
Employee trusts.

Pension, profit sharing, stock bonus, annuity, or other employee trusts established by employers for the purpose of distributing the income and principal of such trust to some or all of their employees, or the beneficiaries of such employees, shall not be invalid as violating any laws or rules against perpetuities or restraints on the power of alienation of title to property; but such trusts may continue for such period of time as may be required by their provisions to accomplish the purposes for which they are established.

History.

1950, p. 740, § 55-13.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-132.
Determination of “lives in being” for purpose of rule against perpetuities.

For the purpose of determining whether the terms of an inter vivos trust provide for a duration in excess of that allowed under the rule against perpetuities, the determination of “lives in being” shall be made as of the death of the settlor, if the settlor has at his death the unrestricted right, acting alone, to revoke the trust or to have transferred to himself the entire legal and beneficial interest in all property, both principal and income, held in the trust. In the event that the settlor surrenders both such rights at any time prior to his death, the determination of “lives in being” shall be made as of the time that the settlor, upon establishment of the trust or otherwise, surrenders the unrestricted right acting alone to revoke the trust and the unrestricted right acting alone to have transferred to himself the entire legal and beneficial interest in all property, both principal and income, held in the trust.

This section shall apply only to a nonvested property interest in an inter vivos trust created before July 1, 2000.

History.

1966, c. 260, § 55-13.2; 2000, c. 714; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Perpetuities and Restraints on Alienation, § 4.

§ 55.1-133.
Application of the rule against perpetuities to nondonative transfers.

Except for the transactions set forth in §

55.1-127

, which are governed by the provisions of §§

55.1-124

through

55.1-129

, a nondonative transfer of an interest in property fails, if the interest does not vest, if it ever vests, within the period of the common-law rule against perpetuities.

The provisions of this section (i) in force on June 30, 2000, shall apply to all donative interests created on or after July 1, 1982, and before July 1, 2000, and (ii) in force on July 1, 2000, shall apply to all nondonative interests created on or after July 1, 1982.

History.

1982, c. 249, § 55-13.3; 2000, cc. 658, 714; 2013, c. 323; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 323, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act are declarative of existing law.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 845 (2001).

For article, “The Future of Future Interests,” see 60 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 513 (2003).

For annual survey article, see “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 189 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Perpetuities and Restraints on Alienation, § 4.